Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.081

Application requirements—Exemptions.

The application requirements of RCW 19.09.075 do not apply to:

(1) Any charitable organization raising less than fifty thousand dollars in any accounting year when all the activities of the organization, including all fund-raising activities, are carried on by persons who are unpaid for their services and no part of the charitable organization's assets or income inures to the benefit of or is paid to any officer, director, member, or trustee of the organization, other than as part of a charitable class benefited by the charitable organization.

(2) Appeals for funds on behalf of a specific individual named in the solicitation, but only if all of the proceeds of the solicitation are given to or expended for the direct benefit of that individual.

[ 2011 c 199 s 3.]